District of Columbia statutes.
3-1322

Operation of bingo and raffles.

The Board may authorize the operation of bingo and raffles in the District of Columbia. Bingo means that form of gambling in which the winning chances are determined by a random drawing of a subset of numbered objects among a total set of 75 objects, consecutively numbered from 1 to 75; and the card, or cards, held by the player, which card or cards is or are sold, rented, or used only at the time of the gambling activity, and contains 5 rows of 5 spaces each, each space imprinted with a number between 1 and 75 inclusive, except the central space which is marked “FREE.” For the purpose of this section, raffle is a lottery, other than that operated by the District of Columbia pursuant to this chapter, in which a prize is won by at least 1 of numerous persons buying chances.

History

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2522.